Colorado, session 2026A, SB117.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 44-40-107, add (12)
as follows:
44-40-107. Licenses.
(12) LOTTERY TICKETS OR INSTANT SCRATCH GAME TICKETS THAT
ARE PRODUCED BY THE LOTTERY FOR SALE TO THE PUBLIC, EITHER DIRECTLY
OR THROUGH THE LICENSEE, MUST NOT BE SOLD ON CREDIT.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 44-40-109, amend
(2)(i), (3)(a)(II), and (3)(a)(III); and add (2)(j) and (3)(a)(IV) as follows:
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

44-40-109. Commission - powers and duties - rules.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, rules
promulgated pursuant to subsection (1) of this section must include:
(i) The manner in which lottery sales revenues are to be collected;
AND
(j) A PROHIBITION ON THE LOTTERY OR A LICENSEE'S SALE OF ANY
LOTTERY TICKETS PRODUCED BY THE LOTTERY FOR SALE TO THE PUBLIC,
DIRECTLY OR THROUGH THE LICENSEE, ON CREDIT.
(3) (a) The commission shall promulgate rules pursuant to
subsection (1) of this section for the general administration of all instant
scratch games. The rules must include:
(II) The method of paying prizes on winning instant scratch game
tickets; and
(III) The manner and amount of compensation, if any, to be paid to
licensed sales agents necessary to provide for the adequate availability of
instant scratch game tickets to prospective buyers and for the convenience
of the public; AND
(IV) A PROHIBITION ON THE SALE OF INSTANT SCRATCH GAME
TICKETS PRODUCED BY THE LOTTERY FOR SALE TO THE PUBLIC, EITHER
DIRECTLY OR THROUGH THE LICENSEE, ON CREDIT.
SECTION 3. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
PAGE 2-SENATE BILL 26-117

the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
James Rashad Coleman, Sr. Julie McCluskie
PRESIDENT OF SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
____________________________ ____________________________
Esther van Mourik Vanessa Reilly
SECRETARY OF CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 3-SENATE BILL 26-117